District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0470.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Innovate DC Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 2032 of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development
Limited Grant-Making Authority Act of 2012, effective September 20, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-168;
D.C. Official Code § 1-328.04), is amended by adding new subsections (qq) and (rr) to read as
follows:
“(qq) The Commercialization Lab Grant Program.
“(1) There is established the Commercialization Lab Grant Program, which shall
be administered by the Deputy Mayor of Planning and Economic Development (“DMPED”) to


support cross-sector collaboration and investment in the development of research and innovation
facilities and programs in the District of Columbia in targeted technology industries.
“(2) DMPED shall award grants of up to $2 million through a competitive
grant process to groups representing at least 2 of the following sectors:
“(A) Accelerators or incubators;
“(B) District-based non-profit organizations focused on supporting
entrepreneurs, workforce development, and ecosystem-building in technology and innovation
industries;
“(C) Economic development organizations, including Business
Improvement Districts;
“(D) Hospitals;
“(E) Independent research organizations;
“(F) Post-secondary educational institution; and
“(G) Technology firms in a sector defined in paragraph (3)(A) of this
subsection.
“(3) Grant applicants shall demonstrate the following in their application:
“(A) Proposal to establish or further develop a research and innovation
facility or program to advance at least one of the following technology sectors:
“(i) Artificial intelligence,
“(ii) Cybersecurity,
“(iii) Defense,
“(iv) Energy and sustainability,
“(v) Life Sciences, or


“(vi) Quantum;
“(B) Private sector participation in their research and innovation facility or
program will support the efficient commercialization of research and innovation findings, with
preference given to applicant groups that include a technology firm in the relevant technology
sector;
“(C) Total requested grant funding over a 3-year period and other
anticipated sources of funding over at least a 5-year period that together will cover the full cost
of the project or a clearly delineated phase of a larger project;
“(D) The ability to match the total value of the grant in the year it is
distributed, with preference given to projects with non-restrictive matching funds; and
“(E) The benefits the project will provide District residents, especially
those from disadvantaged and underrepresented populations.
“(4) For the purpose of this section, the term “post-secondary educational
institution” means an accredited college or university whose principal campus is located in the
District.”.
“(rr) University Proof to Product Research Grant Program.
“(1) There is established the University Proof to Product Research Grant Program,
which shall be administered by the Deputy Mayor of Planning and Economic Development
(“DMPED”) to support early-stage technology research at post-secondary educational
institutions, as defined in for the purpose of advancing technologies towards commercialization.
“(2) DMPED shall award grants to eligible researchers at post-secondary
educational institutions who have developed a technology under a sector defined in subsection
(qq)(3)(A) of this section, according to the following criteria:


“(A) Tier 1 grants shall be a maximum of $100,000 and be used to support
pre-commercialization research, including proof-of-concept studies. Applicants shall
demonstrate the following:
“(i) The formal disclosure of the technology to the university
technology licensing office (“TLO”);
“(ii) Plans for how grant funding would support the technology’s
pathway to commercialization; and
“(iii) The technology addresses an unmet scientific need.
“(B) Tier 2 grants shall be a maximum of $200,000 and be used to support
commercialization planning and research, including a preliminary business plan, a working
prototype, and commercial opportunity assessments. Applicants shall demonstrate the following:
“(i) Tier 1 application requirements;
“(ii) Proof-of-concept data; and
“(iii) A patent has been filed or issued.
“(C) Tier 3 grants shall be a maximum of $300,000 and be used to support
early-stage development of University start-ups. Applicants shall demonstrate the following:
“(i) Tier 1 and Tier 2 application requirements; and
“(ii) A patent has been issued.
“(4) DMPED shall only distribute grants to researchers at post-secondary
educational institutions that:
“(A) Invest at least 10% of licensing revenue into activities that support
research commercialization;


“(B) Provide matching funds in an amount equal or greater to the grant
award;
“(C) Identify priority sector or sectors for research commercialization
from those defined in subsection (qq)(3)(A) of this section; and
“(D) Identify a plan to increase the number of patents filed by students and
researchers from underrepresented backgrounds.
“(5) The applicant’s post-secondary educational institution shall be responsible
for demonstrating all grant-related compliance, including submission of documentation required
by DMPED.”.
Sec. 4. DC Tech marketing strategy.
(a) The Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development (“DMPED”) shall
convene a working group of representatives from the sectors identified in section 2032(qq)(2) of
the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic Development Limited Grant-Making Authority
100 Act of 2012, effective September 20, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-168; D.C. Official Code § 1-
101 328.04(qq)(2)), to develop a comprehensive marketing strategy to promote the District as an
102 innovation and technology hub.
103 (b) The marketing strategy shall include, at a minimum:
104 (1) The creation of a distinct identity or brand for the District, focused on the
105 sectors identified in section 2032(qq)(3)(A) of the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
106 Development Limited Grant-Making Authority Act of 2012, effective September 20, 2012 (D.C.
107 Law 19-168; D.C. Official Code § 1-328.04(qq)(3)(A)), that differentiates the District from other
108 jurisdictions; and
109 (2) The development of promotional materials that highlight:


110 (A) Success stories of technology companies founded in the District; and
111 (B) Programming and resources provided organizations and institutions in
112 the District that support the expansion of the District’s technology ecosystem.
113 (c) Based on the recommendations of the working group, by no later than October, 2026,
114 DMPED shall develop and distribute promotional materials designed to attract researchers,
115 entrepreneurs, and investors to the District.
116 Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
117 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
118 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
119 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
120 Sec. 4. Effective date.
121 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
122 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
123 as provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
124 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code§ l-206.02(c)(l)).